Massachusetts, session 194th, H515.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, subsection (k)
of section 12B of chapter 76 of the General Laws shall not apply to public schools in the town of
Hancock.
SECTION 2. Nothing in this act shall prevent public schools in the town of Hancock to
continue to participate in the school choice program under section 12B of chapter 76 of the
General Laws after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1